District of Columbia statutes.
50-2304.04

Time limitation.

(a)

No appeal shall be reviewed if it is filed more than 30 calendar days after service of notice of the determination appealed from.

(b)

Service of notice under this section shall be complete 3 calendar days after the Department sends the reconsideration determination to the person.

(c)

An appeal filed by mail shall be timely if postmarked within the 30-day period.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 404, 25 DCR 1275
July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-127, § 3(l), 61 DCR 5711

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-634.
1973 Ed., § 40-1124.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-127 substituted “30 calendar days” for “15 calendar days” in (a); rewrote (b); and substituted “30-day period” for “15-day period” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-127: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.